test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_US_STEM_1_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - kus - ENGLISH : # CLASS_US_STEM_1

     kus+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: kus
     kus+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kus
     kus+V+RELATIVE: kuss
     kus+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: kusäsáa
     kus+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: kusäs
     kus+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: kusäsáang
     kus+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: kusäsga
     kus+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: kusäsáas
     kus+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: kusäsáa.ang
     kus+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: kus'úuj
     kus+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kus'úujang
     kus+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: kusäsáa'uujang
     kus+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: kus'us
     kus+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: kus'ujáa
     kus+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: kus'úujaangaa
     kus+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: kusäsáa'us
     kus+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: kusäsáa'ahlans
     kus+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: kusäséehl
     kus+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: kus'úu
     kus+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: kus'wáa
     kus+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kus'wáa
     kus+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kus'wáang
     kus+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: kus'wägán
     kus+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: kus'áawaa
     kus+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: kus'áawaan
     kus+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: kus'wáas
     kus+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: kus'áawaas
     kus+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: kus'wáa.ang
     kus+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: kus'áawaa.ang
     kus+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: kus'wägíinii
     kus+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: kus'wägáangaa
     kus+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: kus'wägáangaan
     kus+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: kus'wáaäsaa
     kus+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: kus'wáaäs
     kus+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: kus'wáaäsaang
     kus+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: kus'wáaäsga
     kus+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: kus'wáaäsaas
     kus+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: kus'wáaäsaa.ang
     kus+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: kus'wáa.ang k̲asa'áa
     kus+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: kus'wáa.ang k̲asa'áang
     kus+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: kus'wáa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     kus+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: kus'wáa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     kus+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: kus'wáa'uuj
     kus+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kus'wáa'uujang
     kus+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: kus'wáaäsaa'uujang
     kus+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: kus'wáa'us
     kus+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: kus'wáa'ujaa
     kus+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: kus'wáa'uujaangaa
     kus+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: kus'wáaäsaa'us
     kus+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: kus'wáa'ahlanggang
     kus+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: kus'wáa'ahlanggan
     kus+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: kus'wáa'ahlanggiinii
     kus+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: kus'wáaäsaa'ahlans
     kus+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: kus'wáa'ahlans
     kus+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: kus'áawaa'ahlang
     kus+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: kus'áawaa'ahlanggaa
     kus+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: kus'áawaa'ahlanggang
     kus+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: kus'wáa'ahl
     kus+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: kus'wáaäseehl
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: kus'áng
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: kus'ángga
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kus'áng
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kus'ánggang
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: kus'ánggan
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: kus'áangaa
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: kus'áangaan
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: kus'áns
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: kus'áangaas
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: kus'angáng
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: kus'áangaa.ang
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: kus'ánggang
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: kus'ánggiinii
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: kus'ánggaangaa
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: kus'ánggaangaan
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: kus'ángäsaa
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: kus'ángäs
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: kus'ángäsaang
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: kus'ángäsga
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: kus'ángäsaas
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: kus'ángäsaa.ang
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: kus'áng'uuj
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kus'áng'uujang
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: kus'ángäsaa'uujang
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: kus'áng'us
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: kus'áng'ujaa
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: kus'áng'uujaangaa
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: kus'ángäsaa'us
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: kus'áang'ahlanggang
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: kus'áang'ahlanggan
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: kus'áang'ahlanggiinii
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: kus'ángäsaa'ahlans
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: kus'áang'ahlans
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: kus'áangaa'ahlang
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: kus'áangaa'ahlanggaa
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: kus'áangaa'ahlanggang
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: kus'áang'ahl
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: kus'ángäseehl
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: kus'áng'uu
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: kus'áng'waa
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kus'áng'waa
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kus'áng'waang
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: kus'áng'wägan
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: kus'áng'aawaa
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: kus'áng'aawaan
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: kus'áng'waas
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: kus'áng'aawaas
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: kus'áng'waa.ang
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: kus'áng'aawaa.ang
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: kus'áng'wägiinii
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: kus'áng'wägaangaa
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: kus'áng'wägaangaan
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: kus'áng'waaäsaa
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: kus'áng'waaäs
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: kus'áng'waaäsaang
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: kus'áng'waaäsga
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: kus'áng'waaäsaas
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: kus'áng'waaäsaa.ang
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: kus'wáa.ang k̲asaa'áng
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: kus'wáa.ang k̲asaa'ánggang
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: kus'wáa.ang k̲asaasdlä'áng
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: kus'wáa.ang k̲asaasdlä'ánggang
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: kus'áng'waa'uuj
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: kus'áng'waa'uujang
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: kus'áng'waaäsaa'uujang
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: kus'áng'waa'us
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: kus'áng'waa'ujaa
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: kus'áng'waa'uujaangaa
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: kus'áng'waaäsaa'us
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: kus'áng'waa'ahlanggang
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: kus'áng'waa'ahlanggan
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: kus'áng'waa'ahlanggiinii
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: kus'áng'waaäsaa'ahlans
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: kus'áng'waa'ahlans
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: kus'áng'aawaa'ahlang
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: kus'áng'aawaa'ahlanggaa
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: kus'áng'aawaa'ahlanggang
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: kus'áng'waa'ahl
     kus+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: kus'áng'waaäseehl
